Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 462.070 is amended to read:
462.070. (1) The Oregon Racing  Commission may adopt rules establishing license fees for persons
described in ORS 462.020 (2), not to exceed [ $30] $150 per year. Prior  to adopting a rule that es-
tablishes a fee for a license, the commission shall  review the fees charged for similar licenses in
other states. The commission also may charge a reasonable fee for claiming certificates  in an
amount not to exceed $10.
(2) The license fee per fiscal year for operators of public training tracks or  kennels required to
be licensed under ORS 462.020 (3) shall be:
(a) For the Oregon State Fair or a county or district fair, $10.
(b) For all other operators of public training tracks or kennels, $25.
(3) The commission may by  rule provide for a license that is issued to a person described in ORS
462.020 (2) to be valid for one, two or three years from date of  issuance. The commission may fix
the expiration date of the license and may prorate the fee established for the license.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 462.725 is amended to read:
462.725. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the Oregon Racing Commission
may adopt rules to:
(a) License and regulate all phases of operation of Multi-Jurisdictional Simulcasting and  Inter-
active Wagering Totalizator Hubs located in Oregon; and
(b) Authorize and license  Multi-Jurisdictional Simulcasting and Interactive Wagering Totalizator
Hubs to conduct simulcast broadcasting of, and mutuel wagering on, animal races,  including previ-
ously held races on which mutuel wagering is lawful in Oregon.
(2) In addition to the other rules of operation adopted by the commission,  the commission shall
adopt a rule setting the amount that may be taken from the gross  receipts of the multi-jurisdictional
mutuel system.
(3) All employees working in Oregon and all officers of any Multi-Jurisdictional  Simulcasting
and Interactive Wagering Totalizator Hubs located and operating in  Oregon must obtain a license
from the commission  prior to the commencement of business or employment. The commission shall
adopt rules establishing license fees for the employees and officers, not to exceed  [ $30] $150 per
year.
Enrolled Senate Bill 853 (SB 853-INTRO) Page 1
(4) Payments to be made to the commission include:
(a) Multi-Jurisdictional Simulcasting and Interactive Wagering Totalizator Hub license  fee not
more than [ $200] $225 per operating day.
(b) Not more than one percent of  total gross receipts of mutuel wagering recorded by the
totalizator system.
(5) Of the moneys received by the commission  under subsection (4)(b) of this section, 25 percent
shall be paid to  the State Treasurer for deposit in the General Fund and 75 percent shall be retained
by the commission. The commission may adopt rules under which the  moneys retained by the com-
mission may be distributed for the benefit of the Oregon pari-mutuel racing industry.
(6) Wagers on  previously held races authorized under subsection (1) of this section are subject
to the provisions of ORS 462.157.
(7) A Multi-Jurisdictional Simulcasting and Interactive Wagering Totalizator Hub licensee  may
establish an account for wagering on greyhound  racing for an individual unless wagering on live
greyhound racing is unlawful in the jurisdiction of the individual’s principal residence.
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate June 10, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 17, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 853 (SB 853-INTRO) Page 2